fi: Elektroniikka > Audio > Audiolaitteet > Kaiutintarvikkeet > Kaiutinkomponentit ja pakkaukset: Kaiuttimen liitin ja päätevaste; Kaiuttimen jakosuodin; Kaiutinelementti; Kaiutinkotelo ja -laatikko; Kaiuttimen suojaritilä ja -kangas
cs: Elektronika > Zvuk > Zvuková zařízení – příslušenství > Reproduktory – příslušenství > Sady a součásti reproduktorů: Konektory a svorky pro reproduktory; Výhybky pro reproduktory; Měniče pro reproduktory; Skříně a boxy pro reproduktory; Mřížky a mřížkové tkaniny pro reproduktory
pl: Elektronika > Audio > Akcesoria audio > Akcesoria do głośników > Części do głośników i zestawy: Złącza i zaciski głośnika; Filtry częstotliwościowe głośnika; Głowice głośnika; Obudowy i pudełka głośnika; Kratki głośnika i tkaniny kratki
ru: Электроника > Аудиотехника > Аксессуары для аудиотехники > Аксессуары для колонок > Детали и наборы деталей для колонок: Разъемы и клеммы для динамиков; Кроссоверы для динамиков; Драйверы для динамиков; Корпуса и боксы для динамиков; Решетки и акустическая ткань для динамиков
tr: Elektronik > Ses > Ses Aksesuarları > Hoparlör Aksesuarları > Hoparlör Bileşenleri ve Kitleri: Hoparlör Konektörleri ve Terminalleri; Hoparlör Crossover'ları; Hoparlör Sürücüleri; Hoparlör Muhafazaları ve Kutuları; Hoparlör Izgaraları ve Izgara Bezleri
hr-HR: Elektronika > Audio > Audio pribor > Pribor za zvučnike > Dijelovi i setovi zvučnika: Konektori za zvučnike; Crossoveri za zvučnike; Driveri za zvučnike; Kućišta i kutije za zvučnike; Rešetke za zvučnike
lt-LT: Elektronika > Garsas > Garso priedai > Garsiakalbių priedai > Garsiakalbių komponentai ir rinkiniai: Garsiakalbio jungos ir terminals; Garsiakalbio kryžiai; Garsiakalbio varikiai; Garsiakalbio apsaugos ir boxes; Garsiakalbio tinkleliai ir grill cloths
ro-RO: Electronice > Audio > Accesorii audio > Accesorii difuzoare > Componente și seturi pentru difuzoare: Conectori și terminale pentru difuzoare; Filtre încrucișate pentru difuzoare; Drivere pentru difuzoare; Incinte și cutii pentru difuzoare; Grile și pânză pentru difuzoare
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Ήχος > Αξεσουάρ ήχου > Αξεσουάρ ηχείων > Εξαρτήματα & κιτ ηχείων: Συνδετήρες & ακροδέκτες ηχείων; Διαιρέτες συχνοτήτων ηχείων; Οδηγοί ηχείων; Περιβλήματα & κουτιά ηχείων; Πλέγματα & υφάσματα προστασίας ηχείων
fr: Appareil électronique > Audio > Accessoires audio > Accessoires pour enceintes > Composants et kits pour enceintes: Connecteurs et bornes de haut-parleur; Filtres de haut-parleur (crossovers); Haut-parleurs; Boîtiers et caisses de haut-parleur; Grilles et tissus acoustiques pour haut-parleurs
sl-SI: Elektronika > Avdio > Avdio dodatki > Dodatki za zvočnike > Komponente in kompleti za zvočnike: Konektorji in terminali za zvočnike; Zvočniški frekvenčni delilniki; Zvočniški gonilniki; Ohišja za zvočnike; Zvočniške mrežice in blago
sv: Elektronik > Ljud > Ljudtillbehör > Högtalartillbehör > Högtalarkomponenter och -satser: Högtalaranslutningar och terminaler; Delningsfilter för högtalare; Högtalarelement; Högtalarlådor och kabinett; Högtalargaller och tyg
hu: Elektronika > Hang > Hangkiegészítők > Hangszóró-kiegészítők > Hangszórókomponensek és -készletek: Hangszóró-csatlakozók és -terminálok; Hangszóró-keresztváltók; Hangszórómeghajtók; Hangszóróházak és -dobozok; Hangszórórácsok és -rácsvásznak
sk-SK: Elektronika > Zvukové zariadenia > Príslušenstvo pre zvukové zariadenia > Príslušenstvo k reproduktorom > Komponenty a súpravy reproduktorov: Konektory a svorkovnice reproduktorov; Výhybky reproduktorov; Meniče reproduktorov; Skrinky a boxy reproduktorov; Mriežky a mriežkové látky reproduktorov
ja: 電子機器 > オーディオ > オーディオアクセサリー > スピーカーアクセサリー > スピーカー用コンポーネント・キット: スピーカーコネクター・端子; スピーカークロスオーバー; スピーカードライバー; スピーカーエンクロージャー・ボックス; スピーカーグリル・グリルクロス
bg-BG: Електроника > Aудио > Аудиоаксесоари > Аксесоари за високоговорители > Компоненти и комплекти за високоговорители: Конектори и клеми за високоговорител; Кросоувъри за високоговорител; Драйвъри за високоговорител; Кутии и корпуси за високоговорител; Решетки и платна за решетка на високоговорител
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 音频 > 音频配件 > 扬声器配件 > 扬声器组件/套装: 扬声器连接器/端子; 扬声器分频器; 扬声器驱动单元; 扬声器箱体; 扬声器网罩/网布
en: Electronics > Audio > Audio Accessories > Speaker Accessories > Speaker Components & Kits: Speaker Connectors & Terminals; Speaker Crossovers; Speaker Drivers; Speaker Enclosures & Boxes; Speaker Grilles & Grill Cloths
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Áudio > Acessórios para áudio > Acessórios para alto-falantes > Kits e componentes para alto-falantes: Conectores e terminais para alto-falantes; Crossovers para alto-falantes; Drivers para alto-falantes; Gabinetes e caixas para alto-falantes; Grades e tecidos para grades de alto-falantes
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Áudio > Acessórios de áudio > Acessórios de coluna > Kits e componentes de coluna: Conectores e terminais para colunas; Crossovers para colunas; Drivers para colunas; Caixas e gabinetes para colunas; Grelhas e tecidos para colunas
de: Elektronik > Audio > Audiozubehör > Lautsprecherzubehör > Lautsprecherkomponenten & -sets: Lautsprecher-Steckverbinder und -Klemmen; Lautsprecher-Frequenzweichen; Lautsprecher-Treiber; Lautsprecher-Gehäuse und -Boxen; Lautsprecher-Gitter und -Stoffbezüge
da: Elektronik > Lyd > Lyd – tilbehør > Højttaler – tilbehør > Højttalerkomponenter og -sæt: Højttaler – stik og terminaler; Højttaler – crossovers; Højttaler – drivere; Højttaler – kabinetter og kasser; Højttaler – gitre og gitterklude
nb: Elektronikk > Lyd > Lydtilbehør > Høyttalertilbehør > Høyttalerkomponenter og -sett: Høyttalerkontakter og -terminaler; Høyttalerfrekvensdeler; Høyttalerelementer; Høyttalerkabinetter og -bokser; Høyttalergriller og -grillduker
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > เสียง > อุปกรณ์ทางเสียง > อุปกรณ์ลำโพง > ส่วนประกอบและชุดลำโพง: ขั้วต่อและเทอร์มินัลลำโพง; ครอสโอเวอร์ลำโพง; ไดรเวอร์ลำโพง; ตู้และกล่องลำโพง; ตะแกรงและผ้าหุ้มลำโพง
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 音訊設備 > 音響配件 > 揚聲器配件 > 喇叭零組件/套件: 揚聲器連接器及端子; 揚聲器分頻器; 揚聲器驅動器; 揚聲器外殼及盒; 揚聲器柵欄及網布
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Âm thanh > Phụ kiện âm thanh > Phụ kiện loa > Linh kiện phụ kiện loa: Đầu nối và cực loa; Bộ phân chia tần số loa; Driver loa; Vỏ và hộp loa; Lưới và vải loa
es: Electrónica > Audio > Accesorios de audio > Accesorios para altavoces > Kits y componentes para altavoces: Conectores y terminales de altavoz; Crossovers de altavoz; Controladores de altavoz; Gabinetes y cajas de altavoz; Rejillas y telas de rejilla de altavoz
nl: Elektronica > Audio > Audioaccessoires > Luidsprekeraccessoires > Luidsprekercomponenten en -sets: Luidspreker connectoren en terminals; Luidspreker crossovers; Luidspreker drivers; Luidspreker behuizingen en boxen; Luidspreker roosters en roosterdoek
it: Elettronica > Audio > Accessori audio > Accessori per altoparlante > Kit e componenti per altoparlanti: Connettori e terminali degli altoparlanti; Filtri incrociati degli altoparlanti; Driver degli altoparlanti; Involucri e scatole degli altoparlanti; Griglie e tessuti per griglie degli altoparlanti
ko: 전자기기 > 오디오 > 오디오 부대용품 > 스피커 부대용품 > 스피커 구성품/키트: 스피커 커넥터 및 단말기; 스피커 크로스오버; 스피커 드라이버; 스피커 인클로저 및 박스; 스피커 그릴 및 그릴 천